de: Oberflächentextur der Stufen: Griptape; Anti-Rutsch-Pads; Perforiert; Glatt; Strukturiert; Andere
zh-TW: 階梯表面紋理: 防滑貼; 防滑墊; 沖孔; 平滑; 紋理; 其他
sl-SI: Tekstura površine stopnice: Trak za oprijem; Protizdrsne podloge; Perforirano; Gladko; Teksturirano; Drugo
ja: ステップ表面テクスチャ: グリップテープ; 滑り止めパッド; 穴あき; スムース; テクスチャード; その他
da: Overfladetekstur på trin: Griptape; Skridsikre puder; Perforeret; Glat; Tekstureret; Andet
fr: Texture de la surface des marches: Bande antidérapante; Patins antidérapants; Perforé; Lisse; Texturé; Autre
bg-BG: Текстура на повърхността на стъпалото: Лента за захват; Противоплъзгащи подложки; Перфорирано; Гладко; Текстурирано; Друго
pl: Tekstura powierzchni stopnia: Taśma antypoślizgowa; Podkładki antypoślizgowe; Perforowana; Gładka; Teksturowana; Inna
el: Υφή επιφάνειας σκαλοπατιού: Ταινία πρόσφυσης; Αντιολισθητικά πατάκια; Διάτρητο; Λείο; Με υφή; Άλλο
zh-CN: 踏板表面纹理: 防滑贴; 防滑垫; 打孔; 光滑; 纹理; 其他
th: ลักษณะพื้นผิวของขั้นบันได: กริปเทป; แผ่นกันลื่น; แบบเจาะรู; เรียบ; มีพื้นผิว; อื่นๆ
fi: Askelman pintatekstuuri: Liukuesteteippi; Liukuestetyynyt; Rei'itetty; Sileä; Kuvioitu; Muu
hr-HR: Tekstura površine stepenice: Grip traka; Protuklizni podlošci; Perforirano; Glatko; Teksturirano; Ostalo
vi: Kết cấu bề mặt bậc bước chân: Băng dán chống trượt; Miếng đệm chống trượt; Đục lỗ; Nhẵn; Có kết cấu; Khác
ru: Текстура поверхности ступени: Противоскользящая лента; Противоскользящие накладки; Перфорированная; Гладкая; Текстурированная; Другое
sk-SK: Textúra povrchu schodov: Protišmyková páska; Protišmykové podložky; Perforovaný; Hladký; Textúrovaný; Iné
it: Texture della superficie del gradino: Nastro antiscivolo; Cuscinetti antiscivolo; Perforato; Liscio; Testurizzato; Altro
tr: Basamak yüzey dokusu: Kavrama bandı; Kaymaz pedler; Delikli; Pürüzsüz; Dokulu; Diğer
sv: Struktur för stegyta: Grepptejp; Halkskyddande kuddar; Perforerad; Slät; Strukturerad; Övrigt
pt-BR: Textura da superfície do degrau: Fita antiderrapante; Almofadas antiderrapantes; Perfurado; Liso; Texturizado; Outro
nl: Textuur tredevlak: Griptape; Antislippads; Geperforeerd; Glad; Met textuur; Overig
es: Textura de la superficie del escalón: Cinta de agarre; Almohadillas antideslizantes; Perforado; Liso; Texturizado; Otro
ro-RO: Textură a suprafeței treptei: Bandă aderentă; Plăcuțe antiderapante; Perforată; Netedă; Texturată; Altele
nb: Overflatetekstur på trinn: Griptape; Sklisikre puter; Perforert; Glatt; Teksturert; Annet
lt-LT: Laiptelių paviršiaus tekstūra: Sukibimo juosta; Neslystančios pagalvėlės; Perforuota; Lygi; Tekstūrinė; Kita
pt-PT: Textura da superfície do degrau: Fita antiderrapante; Almofadas antiderrapantes; Perfurado; Liso; Texturizado; Outro
ko: 발판 표면 질감: 그립 테이프; 미끄럼 방지 패드; 타공; 매끄러움; 질감 있음; 기타
cs: Povrchová textura schodu: Protiskluzová páska; Protiskluzové podložky; Perforovaná; Hladká; S texturou; Jiné
en: Step surface texture: Grip tape; Non-slip pads; Perforated; Smooth; Textured; Other
hu: Lépőfelület textúrája: Csúszásgátló szalag; Csúszásgátló párnák; Perforált; Sima; Texturált; Egyéb